dist/turkspell-v0.6-dd/tr.dic
afişlemek/≖
alkollemek/≖
analizlemek/≖
aprelemek/≖
artişlemek/≖
artıkemek/≖
arşivlemek/≖
asitlemek/≖
ateşlemek/≖
badiklemek/≖
beklemek/≖
belemek/≖
belgelemek/≖
belgilemek/≖
beliklemek/≖
belirlemek/≖
bellemek/≖
bengilemek/≖
benimsemek/≖
benzinlemek/≖
berelemek/≖
beselemek/≖
bestelemek/≖
betilemek/≖
bezeklemek/≖
bezemek/≖
bezlemek/≖
beşlemek/≖
bilemek/≖
bileğilemek/≖
birlemek/≖
bizlemek/≖
biçimlemek/≖
briyantinlemek/≖
bölmelemek/≖
ceplemek/≖
daim eylemek/≖
deflemek/≖
demetlemek/≖
demlemek/≖
denetlemek/≖
deneylemek/≖
denklemek/≖
derecelemek/≖
derlemek/≖
desenlemek/≖
destelemek/≖
değirmilemek/≖
deşelemek/≖
dikizlemek/≖
dilimlemek/≖
dingildemek/≖
diplemek/≖
diremek/≖
dirgenlemek/≖
dizelemek/≖
dizginlemek/≖
dizinlemek/≖
dişemek/≖
dişlemek/≖
dublelemek/≖
dönelemek/≖
düvesimek/≖
düğmelemek/≖
edememek/≖
efildemek/≖
eklemek/≖
eksenlemek/≖
eleklemek/≖
elemek/≖
elleçlemek/≖
emeklemek/≖
emreylemek/≖
endazelemek/≖
enemek/≖
eniklemek/≖
eprimek/≖
ergimek/≖
erimek/≖
ertelemek/≖
eselemek beselemek/≖
esinlemek/≖
eskimek/≖
esnemek/≖
eteklemek/≖
etenelemek/≖
etiketlemek/≖
etkimek/≖
evelemek gevelemek/≖
evleklemek/≖
evsemek/≖
eylemek/≖
ezgilemek/≖
eğlemek/≖
eşdüzeylemek/≖
eşitlemek/≖
felfellemek/≖
fidelemek/≖
filarizlemek/≖
fingirdemek/≖
fiskelemek/≖
fitlemek/≖
fişeklemek/≖
fişteklemek/≖
frenlemek/≖
galvanizlemek/≖
garipsemek/≖
gecelemek/≖
gemlemek/≖
genellemek/≖
gereksemek/≖
gerilemek/≖
gevelemek/≖
gevşemek/≖
gezlemek/≖
geçgeçlemek/≖
girenlemek/≖
gizlemek/≖
grafitlemek/≖
gönyelemek/≖
gözetlemek/≖
gübrelemek/≖
güderilemek/≖
güneşlemek/≖
gık dememek/≖
hafiflemek/≖
hak yemek/≖
hançerlemek/≖
harelemek/≖
hayallemek/≖
hedeflemek/≖
hidrojenlemek/≖
hikâyelemek/≖
ifildemek/≖
ileklemek/≖
ilgilemek/≖
ilintilemek/≖
ilmiklemek/≖
imek/≖⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
imlemek/≖
incilemek/≖
indislemek/≖
inildemek/≖
inlemek/≖
ipilemek/≖
iplememek/≖
irdelemek/≖
irilemek/≖
istemek/≖
italiklemek/≖
itelemek/≖
içerlemek/≖
iğnelemek/≖
işaretlemek/≖
işlemek/≖
jiletlemek/≖
kademelemek/≖
kafeslemek/≖
karelemek/≖
kaşelemek/≖
kefenlemek/≖
keklemek/≖
kelepçelemek/≖
kemerlemek/≖
kenetlemek/≖
kerizlemek/≖
kertelemek/≖
kertiklemek/≖
kesinlemek/≖
ketlemek/≖
keşlemek/≖
kilitlemek/≖
kiplemek/≖
kireçsilemek/≖
kitlemek/≖
kişnemek/≖
kodeslemek/≖
kremlemek/≖
köpeklemek/≖
kösteklemek/≖
köşeklemek/≖
kümelemek/≖
kürelemek/≖
lehimlemek/≖
liflemek/≖
listelemek/≖
maddelemek/≖
marizlemek/≖
maskelemek/≖
melemek/≖
menevişlemek/≖
mercümek/≖
merhemlemek/≖
merteklemek/≖
mimlemek/≖
miras yemek/≖
murt yememek/≖
mührelemek/≖
mürekkeplemek/≖
naftalinlemek/≖
nefeslemek/≖
nicelemek/≖
nitelemek/≖
ojelemek/≖
oksitlemek/≖
paniklemek/≖
parametrelemek/≖
parsellemek/≖
pençelemek/≖
perdelemek/≖
peroksitlemek/≖
peylemek/≖
pineklemek/≖
plaselemek/≖
preslemek/≖
reddeylemek/≖
renklemek/≖
resimlemek/≖
reçetelemek/≖
röntgenlemek/≖
sabreylemek/≖
sahnelemek/≖
sakinlemek/≖
sekilemek/≖
semerlemek/≖
sendelemek/≖
sepelemek/≖
sepilemek/≖
sergilemek/≖
serpelemek/≖
seslemek/≖
sezinlemek/≖
seğrimek/≖
siklememek/≖
simgelemek/≖
siperlemek/≖
sistirelemek/≖
sotelemek/≖
söylemsemek/≖
sözünü esirgememek/≖
sürmelemek/≖
süyeklemek/≖
takdir eylemek/≖
tarihlemek/≖
tasniflemek/≖
tebeşirlemek/≖
tekerlemek/≖
teklemek/≖
tekmillemek/≖
tellemek/≖
temizlemek/≖
tenekelemek/≖
tepiklemek/≖
tepkimek/≖
terbiyelemek/≖
terslemek/≖
testerelemek/≖
tetiklemek/≖
teyellemek/≖
tipilemek/≖
tirelemek/≖
titremek/≖
torpillemek/≖
tökezimek/≖
tüneklemek/≖
venilemek/≖
verniklemek/≖
yedeklemek/≖
yeleklemek/≖
yellemek/≖
yelpirdemek/≖
yemlemek/≖
yenişememek/≖
yeğlemek/≖
yeğnisemek/≖
yivlemek/≖
yükseltgemek/≖
zedelemek/≖
zenginlemek/≖
zincirlemek/≖
çekememek/≖
çekiçlemek/≖
çelmelemek/≖
çemenlemek/≖
çenetlemek/≖
çenilemek/≖
çepellemek/≖
çevrelemek/≖
çeyizlemek/≖
çeşitlemek/≖
çiftelemek/≖
çilelemek/≖
çimdiklemek/≖
çimenlemek/≖
çirişlemek/≖
çiselemek/≖
çitilemek/≖
çitlemek/≖
çivitlemek/≖
çizelgelemek/≖
çiçeklemek/≖
çiğitlemek/≖
öbeklemek/≖
ödevlemek/≖
ölçeklemek/≖
öncellemek/≖
önemsememek/≖
örneklemek/≖
örselemek/≖
özdeşlemek/≖
üstelemek/≖
şakullemek/≖
şeddelemek/≖
şerbetlemek/≖
şiflemek/≖
şiniklemek/≖
şişlemek/≖
